Arkansas, session 2025, HB1411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-71-110, concerning the powers and duties
of the Oil and Gas Commission, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(g) The commission has the following specific powers and duties in
administering the underground storage of carbon dioxide, the Underground
Injection Control program regarding Class VI wells, and the Carbon Dioxide
Storage Fund:
(1) To adopt rules to govern the underground storage of carbon
dioxide and to implement the Underground Injection Control program regarding
Class VI wells, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Safe Drinking
Water Act, 42 U.S.C. §300f et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(2) To require financial assurance conditioned on the
performance of the duty to comply with all rules governing the underground
storage of carbon dioxide and the Underground Injection Control program
*CRH121*
02/04/2025 2:13:25 PM CRH121

HB1411
regarding Class VI wells;
(3) To determine, after notice and hearing, when a project for
the underground storage of carbon dioxide is issued a Certificate of Closure
that shall not be less than ten (10) years after the cessation of carbon
dioxide injection operations;
(4) To collect the fees assessed by the commission under this
subchapter and make deposits into the Oil and Gas Commission Fund or the
Carbon Dioxide Storage Fund;
(5) To require the payment of a carbon dioxide storage permit
application fee not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to be
deposited into the Oil and Gas Commission Fund;
(6) To require an annual well fee of one thousand dollars
($1,000) per Class VI injection well permitted in the carbon dioxide storage
facility to be deposited into the Oil and Gas Commission Fund; and
(7) To require a fee of ten cents ($0.10) on each ton of carbon
dioxide injected for storage with funds to be deposited as follows:
(A) Three Cents ($0.03) shall be paid into the Oil and Gas
Commission Fund; and
(B) Seven Cents ($0.07) shall be paid into the Carbon
Dioxide Storage Fund to be utilized by the commission for:
(i) The testing, monitoring, and long-term
inspection of underground carbon dioxide storage wells;
(ii) Expenses incurred to remediate post-closure
emergencies;
(iii) The plugging of leaking wells; and
(iv) Other remedial response activities associated
with the carbon dioxide storage facility.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301, concerning the enumeration of
special revenues, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
(276) Fees and revenue collected under § 15-71-110(g).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 6, Subchapter 8, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-6-845. Carbon Dioxide Storage Fund.
02/04/2025 2:13:25 PM CRH121

HB1411
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Carbon Dioxide Storage Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall consist of:
(A) Fees assessed by the Oil and Gas Commission on each
ton of carbon dioxide injected for storage under § 15-71-110(g);
(B) Gifts or grants; and
(C) Any other revenue as may be authorized by law.
(2) All moneys collected under the fund shall be deposited into
the State Treasury to the credit of the fund as special revenues.
(c)(1) The fund shall be used by the commission to:
(A) Make expenditures through contracts to plug abandoned
Class VI wells, to monitor wells, and to remediate associated production
facilities;
(B) Make expenditures for emergency repairs to Class VI
wells, monitoring wells, or production facilities remaining after post
closure which are endangering the public health and safety;
(C) Make expenditures for testing, monitoring, and long-
term inspection of underground carbon dioxide storage wells and facilities
after post closure; and
(D) Following the issuance of a Certificate of Closure and
release of all financial assurance instruments, cover costs associated with
the leakage of carbon dioxide from underground carbon dioxide storage
facilities or any other operations and activities deemed necessary by the
commission to protect underground sources of drinking water and for public
health and safety.
(2) Expenditures from the fund may be authorized by the
commission through contracts or direct payments.








02/04/2025 2:13:25 PM CRH121